Alaska statutes. Title 5. Amusements and Sports.
Article 2. Accidents and Liability.

Sec. 05.25.030.
Boat collisions, accidents, and casualties.

The operator of a boat involved in a collision, accident, or casualty shall

render assistance as is practicable and necessary to save other persons from danger or to minimize the danger to other persons to the extent that the operator can do so without serious danger to the operator’s boat, crew, and passengers; and

give the operator’s name, address, and identification number of the operator’s boat in writing to each person injured in the collision, accident, or casualty and to the owner of property damaged in the collision, accident, or casualty.

For the purpose of gathering boating accident statistics, the operator of a boat involved in a collision, accident, or casualty that results in death or injury to a person, or damage to property in excess of $500 for each incident, shall file a report with the Department of Public Safety on or before the 20th day after the incident. The Department of Public Safety shall prepare a form for the report and make the form available to other agencies and to the public.

In response to a request from an authorized official or agency of the United States, a law enforcement agency, or in compliance with United States Coast Guard regulations, the Department of Public Safety shall provide statistical information compiled or otherwise available to the Department of Public Safety from the reports required under (b) of this section.

History.

(§ 6 ch 63 SLA 1961; am § 6 ch 28 SLA 2000)

Delayed amendment. —

Under secs. 7 and 30, ch. 28, SLA 2000, as amended by sec. 3, ch. 34, SLA 2004, sec. 1, ch. 19, SLA 2009, § 1, ch. 47, SLA 2010, and § 3, ch. 31, SLA 2012, effective on the occurrence of the contingency described in sec. 30(2), ch. 28, SLA 2000 and set out in the editor’s notes at the beginning of this chapter, this section will read as follows: “(a) The operator of a watercraft involved in a collision, accident, or casualty shall give to other persons affected by the collision, accident, or casualty assistance that is necessary to save them from or minimize any danger caused by the collision, accident, or casualty, and shall give the operator’s name, address, and identification of the operator’s watercraft in writing to any person injured and to the owner of any property damaged in the collision, accident, or casualty.

“(b) In the case of collision, accident, or casualty involving a watercraft, the operator of the watercraft, if the collision, accident, or casualty results in death or injury to a person or damage to property in excess of $100, shall file with the department a full description of the collision, accident, or casualty, including information the department, by regulation, requires.”

As of May 2022, the contingency had not been met.

Collateral references. —

12 Am. Jur. 2d, Boats and Boating, §§ 34-50.

65 C.J.S., Negligence, §§ 59, 80, 149

65A C.J.S., Negligence, § 583.

Liability of owner or operator of boat livery for injury to patron, 94 ALR3d 876.

Liability of owner or operator of powered pleasure boat for injuries to swimmer or bather struck by boat, 98 ALR3d 1127.

Criminal liability for injury or death caused by operation of pleasure boat, 8 ALR4th 886.

Insurance: construction and effect of provision of homeowner’s, premises, or personal liability insurance policy covering or excluding watercraft, 26 ALR4th 967.

Validity, construction, and application of state statutes and local ordinances governing personal watercraft use, 118 ALR5th 347.

Sec. 05.25.040.
Owner’s civil liability.

Except as provided under AS

09.65.112

and AS

09.65.290

, the owner of a boat is liable for injury or damage caused by the negligent operation of the owner’s boat whether the negligence consists of a violation of a state statute or the failure to exercise ordinary care in the operation of the boat as the rules of the common law require. The owner is not liable, however, unless the boat is used with the owner’s express or implied consent. It is presumed that the boat is being operated with the knowledge and consent of the owner if, at the time of the injury or damage, it is under the control of the owner’s spouse, father, mother, brother, sister, son, daughter, or other member of the owner’s immediate family. This chapter does not relieve any other person from a liability that the person would otherwise incur and does not authorize or permit recovery in excess of injury or damage actually incurred.

History.

(§ 8 ch 63 SLA 1961; am § 8 ch 28 SLA 2000; am § 1 ch 119 SLA 2003; am § 2 ch 121 SLA 2003)

Delayed amendment. —

Under secs. 9 and 30, ch. 28, SLA 2000, as amended by sec. 3, ch. 34, SLA 2004, sec. 1, ch. 19, SLA 2009, sec. 1, ch. 47, SLA 2010, and sec. 3, ch. 31, SLA 2012, effective on the occurrence of the contingency described in sec. 30(2), ch. 28, SLA 2000 and set out in the editor’s notes at the beginning of this chapter, this section will read as follows: “Except as provided under AS

09.65.112

and AS

09.65.290

, the owner of a watercraft is liable for injury or damage caused by the negligent operation of the owner’s watercraft whether the negligence consists of a violation of a state statute or neglecting to observe ordinary care in the operation of the watercraft as the rules of the common law require. The owner is not liable, however, unless the watercraft is used with the owner’s express or implied consent. It is presumed that the watercraft is being operated with the knowledge and consent of the owner if, at the time of the injury or damage, it is under the control of the owner’s spouse, father, mother, brother, sister, son, daughter, or other member of the owner’s immediate family. This chapter does not relieve any other person from a liability that the person would otherwise incur and does not authorize or permit recovery in excess of injury or damage actually incurred.”

As of May 2022, the contingency had not been met.

Editor’s notes. —

Section 4, ch. 119, SLA 2003, provides that the 2003 amendment to this section made by that Act “applies to causes of action that accrue on or after the effective date of the applicable section of the Act.”
Under sec. 6, ch. 119, SLA 2003, the effective date of the amendment made by sec. 1 of that Act is July 1, 2003. Section 5, ch. 121, SLA 2003, provides that the 2003 amendment to this section made by that Act “applies to acts or omissions that occur on or after September 16, 2003.”